Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14A-113] Annual accounting;
dividends. (a) The company shall conduct an annual accounting of its
incurred loss experience and expenses.

(b) The board may declare and apportion
reasonable dividends to policyholders, determined by an actuarial opinion
prepared by a qualified actuary after evaluating the impact of the dividends on
the solvency of the company. The dividends may be paid or credited to
policyholders according to classifications of policies established by the
board.

(c) No dividends shall be:

(1) Paid or credited in a manner that unfairly
discriminates between policies within the same classification;

(2) Made contingent upon payment of any renewal
premium on any policy; or

(3) Paid or credited in the first three years of
operation of the company. [L 1996, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next